Utah statutes.
16-16-1214.   Statement of dissolution.

(1)  A limited cooperative association that has dissolved or is about to dissolve may deliver to the division for filing a statement of dissolution that states:

(a)  the name of the association;

(b)  the date the association dissolved or will dissolve; and

(c)  any other information the association considers relevant.

(2)  A person has notice of a limited cooperative association's dissolution on the later of:

(a)  90 days after a statement of dissolution is filed; or

(b)  the effective date stated in the statement of dissolution.

